North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 3. Secretary of State.

§ 55-1-30.
Powers.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-1-31.
Interrogatories by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State may propound to any corporation, domestic or foreign which he has reason to believe is subject to the provisions of this Chapter, and to any officer or director thereof, such written interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to enable him to ascertain whether such corporation is subject to the provisions of this Chapter or has complied with all the provisions of this Chapter applicable to it. Subject to applicable jurisdictional requirements, such interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days after the mailing therefor, or within such additional time as shall be fixed by the Secretary of State, and the answers thereto shall be full and complete and shall be made in writing and under oath. If such interrogatories be directed to an individual they shall be answered by him, and if directed to a corporation they shall be answered by the president, vice-president, secretary or assistant secretary thereof. The Secretary of State shall certify to the Attorney General, for such action as the Attorney General may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this Chapter, requiring or permitting action by the Attorney General.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55-165 with minor modifications to provide the Secretary of State a formal mechanism for obtaining information necessary for him to carry out his duties. It does not appear in the Model Act.

§ 55-1-32.
Penalties imposed upon corporations, officers, and directors for failure to answer interrogatories.

The knowing failure or refusal of a domestic or foreign corporation to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed in this Chapter interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall constitute grounds for administrative dissolution under

G.S. 55-14-20

or for revocation under

G.S. 55-15-30

, as the case may be.

Each officer and director of a domestic or foreign corporation who knowingly fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this Chapter to answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded to him by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 440; c. 552, s. 3; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55-166 with two exceptions. First, a violation of this section by a corporation is not a misdemeanor; instead, the Secretary of State is empowered to suspend the offending corporation’s articles of incorporation or certificate of authority to do business. Natural persons who violate the section are guilty of a misdemeanor. Second, the provisions relating to signing false documents were omitted and are covered by

G.S. 55-1-29

.

§ 55-1-33.
Information disclosed by interrogatories.

Interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State and the answers thereto shall not be open to public inspection nor shall the Secretary of State disclose any facts or information obtained therefrom except insofar as his official duty may require the same to be made public or in the event such interrogatories or the answers thereto are required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or in any other action or proceedings by this State.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55-167.

§§ 55-1-34 through 55-1-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.